tests/commonwords.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../xal.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../xal.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Most Common Words:
    Бурхн<n><sg>: Бурхн 
    Хальмг<n>: Хальмг
    болн<conjcoo>: болн
    ик<unk>: ик
    Зая<unk>: Зая
    болтха<unk>: болтха
    Эн<unk>: Эн
    болв<unk>: болв
    төлә<unk>: төлә 
    н<unk>: н 
    күн<unk>: күн 
    Би<unk>: Би
    андит<unk>: андит
    илд<unk>: илд
    уга<unk>: уга
    тер<unk>: тер
    сән<unk>: сән
    келв<unk>: келв
    анав<unk>: анав
    бәә<unk>: бәә
